District of Columbia statutes.
35-121

Abandonment of railroad substation authorized.

Upon the completion by it of the substitute facilities authorized by § 35-122 hereof, the Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington Railroad Company is authorized, without any further or other authority, to abandon and remove the 7th Street substation built and maintained by it pursuant to the requirements of Act of February 3, 1909 (35 Stat. 593, ch. 63), and to abandon the ticket agency and baggage accommodations maintained by it pursuant to the requirements of said Act.

July 25, 1935, 49 Stat. 497, ch. 415, § 1

History

This section is referenced in § 35-124.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 44-104.
1973 Ed., § 44-104.

Prior Codifications